Idaho statutes. Title 26 BANKS AND BANKING
Chapter 21 IDAHO CREDIT UNION ACT
§ 26-2177. Official family — Idaho corporate credit union.

The business affairs of the corporate credit union shall be managed by a board of directors of at least seven (7) directors. One (1) director shall be elected from the designated delegates of each of the seven (7) credit union chapters of the state, as defined by the Idaho credit union league structure. The board of directors may serve as the supervisory committee or may employ an auditor acceptable to the director and may delegate certain loan functions and preapproved lending limits to the manager of the corporate credit union.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2177, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2178. Officers — Idaho corporate credit union.

Within sixty (60) days following the organizational meeting and at each annual meeting, the directors shall elect from their own number a chairman, one (1) or more vice-chairmen, a treasurer and a secretary, of whom the last two (2) may be the same individual. An assistant treasurer may be appointed by the board of directors. The chairman and secretary shall execute a certificate of election which shall set forth the names and addresses of the officers, directors and members elected or appointed. The certificate of election shall be executed on a form approved by the department of finance and one (1) copy of each shall be filed with the department of finance within ten (10) days after such election or appointment. The terms of the officers shall be for such terms respectively as the bylaws provide, and until their successors are chosen and have been duly qualified.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2178, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582; am. 1988, ch. 158, § 4, p. 285.

§ 26-2179. Board of directors — Idaho corporate credit union.

The board of directors of the corporate credit union shall have the same general powers and duties as boards of directors of credit unions organized under the Idaho credit union act and in the corporate credit union bylaws.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2179, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2180. Loans to member credit unions — Idaho corporate credit union.

The Idaho corporate credit union may loan to members upon such security and for purposes only as provided in its bylaws. Loans shall be evidenced by a written instrument and within limits set by board policy. No loan shall be made unless approved in writing by a majority of the board of directors or manager as delegated by the board of directors.

The board may establish lines of credit to member credit unions based on the financial statements of the member credit union. Where a line of credit has been approved, application for loans need no further consideration as long as the aggregate obligation does not exceed the limits of such line of credit. The board of directors shall at least once a year review all lines of credit and any lines of credit shall expire if the member becomes more than sixty (60) days delinquent in its obligations to the Idaho corporate credit union.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2180, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2181. Compensation — Corporate officers.

The officers of the corporate credit union shall have the same rights regarding compensation as officers of other credit unions organized under the Idaho credit union act. Nothing in this section is to be interpreted to preclude the corporate credit union officers from receiving an honorarium as established annually by the board of directors for each meeting plus their actual expenses.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2181, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2182. Shares and deposits.

A share is defined as a term applied to each one hundred dollars ($100) standing to the share account of a member. The shares of a credit union shall all be common shares of one (1) class and shall have a par value of one hundred dollars ($100) per share. No certificate shall be issued to denote ownership of a share in the credit union.

In the event of default, the Idaho corporate credit union shall have and may exercise a lien on the shares of any member for any sum due the credit union from said member.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2182, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2183. Reserve allocations — Idaho corporate credit union.

No reserve shall be required for the corporate credit union except a special reserve may be required by the director of finance when an annual examination reflects need for such reserves for potential losses from investments. Loans one (1) month to six (6) months delinquent shall be required to have a reserve equal to ten percent (10%) of the unpaid balance of such loans. Loans over six (6) months delinquent shall be required to have a reserve equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the unpaid balance of such loans. The director may allow distribution of the special reserve if the losses do not materialize.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2183, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2184. Dividends — Idaho corporate credit union.

After allocations to the reserve account if required by the director, the board of directors may at the end of any dividend period duly established, declare a dividend from undivided earnings as the bylaws may provide.

Dividends shall be paid on all fully paid shares outstanding at the close of the dividend periods.

And provided further that the Idaho corporate credit union may pay interest on daily deposit balances of its members which are in excess of the capital share base requirement for membership.

No dividend shall be declared or paid at a time when the corporation is insolvent.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2184, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2185. Applicable provisions of the Idaho credit union act.

The following provisions of the Idaho credit union act shall apply to the Idaho corporate credit union:

Share reduction, section 26-2131, Idaho Code.

Reports, section 26-2133, Idaho Code.

Books and records, section 26-2135, Idaho Code.

Examinations, section 26-2136A, Idaho Code.

False reports, section 26-2137, Idaho Code.

Cease and desist orders, suspension, and liquidation, section 26-2140, Idaho Code.

Administration, rules and regulations, section 26-2144, Idaho Code.

Fiscal year, section 26-2112, Idaho Code.

Penalties for official misconduct, section 26-2117, Idaho Code.

History.

I. C.,§ 26-2185, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582; am. 2020, ch. 214, § 15, p. 625.

§ 26-2186. Taxation — Idaho corporate credit union.

The Idaho corporate credit union shall be deemed an institution for savings and, together with all the accumulations therein, shall not be subject to taxation except to real estate owned. The shares of a credit union shall not be subject to a stock transfer tax when issued by the corporation or when transferred from one (1) member to another.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2186, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2187. Construction against repeal.

This chapter being a general chapter intended as unified coverage of its subject matter, no part of it shall be deemed to be impliedly repealed by subsequent legislation if such construction can reasonably be avoided.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2187, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2188. Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provisions or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2188, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.